Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
PROTECTION OF SHEEP AND CATTLE - CONTROL PROGRAMS

35-40-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cattle" includes cattle in the field or on the range, but not in feed lots.

"Owners of sheep and cattle" means the owners of sheep and cattle in the field or on the range, but shall not include the owners of sheep and cattle maintained in feed lots.

"Sheep" includes sheep in the field or on the range, but not in feed lots.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 191, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-25.

35-40-202. Sheep program.

For the protection of sheep against predatory animals, the board of county commissioners of any county, upon the recommendation of an association of sheep growers in the county, has power, either alone or in conjunction with other counties, to conduct a predatory animal control program for the protection of sheep in such county.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 182, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-19.

35-40-203. Cattle program.

For the protection of cattle against predatory animals, the board of county commissioners of any county, upon the recommendation of an association of cattle growers in the county, has power, either alone or in conjunction with other counties, to conduct a predatory animal control program for the protection of cattle in such county.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 182, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-20.

35-40-204. Establishment of program - continuance or discontinuance - license fees.

The owners of at least fifty-one percent of the sheep, or the owners of at least fifty-one percent of the cattle, or the owners of at least fifty-one percent of both sheep and cattle acting jointly in the county, as shown by the assessment rolls of the last preceding assessment, may petition the board of county commissioners to establish a predatory animal control program as provided for in this part 2.

The petition shall be filed on or before the first of November in any year at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board of county commissioners. After examination of the petition, if the board finds the petition in order and properly signed by the owners of at least fifty-one percent of the sheep or cattle, or both, in the county, the board shall establish the predatory animal control program provided for in this part 2 to commence the following calendar year on the first of February of said year; but the license fee as fixed under the provisions of section 35-40-205 shall be assessed only against the owners of sheep if only said owners of sheep petition for the establishment of said program, and only against the owners of cattle if only said owners of cattle so petition, and against both the owners of sheep and cattle if both said owners of sheep and cattle, acting jointly, so petition.

Likewise, the question of an increase or decrease in the license fee, or the question of the discontinuance of the program, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, shall be determined only by the owners of sheep if they petitioned the establishment of the program, and only by the owners of cattle if they petitioned the establishment of the program, and jointly by the owners of both sheep and cattle if they, acting jointly, petitioned the establishment of the program.

The license fee to defray the cost of any program established under the provisions of this part 2, as fixed by the board of county commissioners under the provisions of section 35-40-205, shall remain in full force and effect from year to year without change, unless there is filed with the board a petition signed by the owners of at least fifty-one percent of the sheep, or the owners of at least fifty-one percent of the cattle, or the owners of at least fifty-one percent of both the sheep and cattle acting jointly, in the county, requesting repeal of said license fee in total and discontinuance of the program, or for an increase in said license fee, subject to the limits provided in section 35-40-205, or for a decrease in said license fee, in either of which events, the board of county commissioners shall fix a new license fee to continue from year to year and provide for the continuation of the program within the limits of the aggregate amount of the license fees as collected from year to year.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 182, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-21.

L. 83:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2076, § 2, effective October 7.

L. 97:

(1)(a) amended, p. 181, § 10, effective March 31.

35-40-205. License fee - expenditure of funds.

To defray the expense of the protection afforded by a program established under the provisions of this part 2, the board of county commissioners of any county has the power to require all owners or persons in possession of any cattle, one year old or over, to pay a license fee not exceeding thirty cents per head of cattle so owned or possessed by the owner or person in the county or brought in from another county or state and herded or grazed in the county. The assessor shall ascertain, in addition to the regular assessment for taxation purposes, all cattle which will be one year old or over as of February 1 within the county in any year in which the program is in effect, and shall keep such information in a separate record from the regular assessment, and shall include any cattle that shall be brought into the county between February 1 and January 31 of the following year to be herded or grazed for any part of the year. The board of county commissioners also has the power to require all sheep owners in the county who marketed sheep during the previous calendar year to pay a license fee not exceeding one dollar per head of sheep for which such payments were received. It is the responsibility of the Colorado sheep and wool board to provide the county assessor, by October 1 of each year, with a list containing the names and addresses of such sheep owners in the county and the number of sheep marketed during the immediately preceding twelve months. Such information shall be transmitted by the county assessor to the board of county commissioners by November 1 of each year. The board of county commissioners also has the power to require all sheep owners who herded or grazed sheep in the county to pay a license fee not exceeding one dollar per head of sheep. The board of county commissioners shall then order the license fee to be levied against all such sheep or cattle, or both, and shall adjust the fee on cattle on the basis of the number of months any cattle will be herded or grazed in the county, and shall adjust the fee on sheep on the basis of the number of months the sheep were herded or grazed in the county during the previous year.

Upon the order of the board of county commissioners, such license fee shall be imposed by the entry thereof in the name of the licensee upon the property tax rolls of the county by the county assessor, and shall be payable to and collected by the county treasurer as and when county personal property taxes are by law payable and collected, and when so levied shall be a lien upon the property of the licensee enforceable under the laws provided for the collection of taxes on personal property. When collected said fees shall be placed by the county treasurer in a predatory animal control fund of the county, and all moneys credited to said fund shall be expended on order of the board of county commissioners of the county for predatory animal control only.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 183, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-22.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1608, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 2077, § 3, effective October 7.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 181, § 11, effective March 31.

35-40-206. Other money credited to fund.

All furs and skins of predatory animals taken as a result of the expenditure of the predatory animal control fund shall be sold, and the proceeds of such sale deposited in said predatory animal control fund for use in carrying out the purposes of this part 2.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 184, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 182, § 12, effective March 31.

35-40-207. Program to be in addition to present program.

The program established by this part 2 shall be in addition to the predatory animal control program established by part 1 of this article.

Source:

L. 61:

p. 184, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 8-7-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 8-7-24.